test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_celkkid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - celkkiđ: # MLO, checked, all from 2SYLL_ID
    celkkiđ+V+Inf: celkkiđ
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciälhám
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ciälháh
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciälkká
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: celkkeen
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: celkkivettee
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: celkkiv
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: celkkip
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: celkkivetteđ
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: celkkih
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: celkkim
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: celkkih
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ceelhij
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: celhijm
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: celhijd
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: celhijn
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ceelhijm
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ceelhijd
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: celkkii
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: ciälháččim
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: ciälháččih
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: ciälháččij
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: ciälháččáim
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: ciälháččáid
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: ciälháččáin
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: ciälháččijm
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: ciälháččijd
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: ciälháččii
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: celheem
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: celheeh
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: ceelhiš
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Du1: celhižeen
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Du2: ceelhišvettee
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Du3: celhižává
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: celhižep
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: ceelhišvetteđ
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: celhižeh
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ceelhi
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: ciälhus
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: ciälkkoon
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: celkkee
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: ciälkkus
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: ciälkkup
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: celkkiđ
    celkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: ciälkkus
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ceelhi
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ciälkkám
    celkkiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: ciälháččii
    celkkiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: ciälháá
    celkkiđ+V+PrsPrc: celkkee
    celkkiđ+V+PrfPrc: ciälkkám
    celkkiđ+V+Actio: celkkim
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Ess: celkkimin
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Loc: celkkimist
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Ill: celkkimân
    celkkiđ+V+Actio+Com: celhidijn
    celkkiđ+V+VAbess: celhihánnáá


  Verb - vyelgiđ: # MLO, checked
    vyelgiđ+V+Inf: vyelgiđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuálgám
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuálgáh
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuálgá
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vyelgeen
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vyelgivettee 
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vyelgiv
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vyelgip
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vyelgivetteđ 
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vyelgih
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuolgim
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuolgih
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuolgij
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vuolgijm
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vuolgijd 
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuolgijn
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vuolgijm
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuolgijd
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuolgii

    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: vuálgáččim
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: vuálgáččih
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: vuálgáččij
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: vuálgáččáim
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: vuálgáččáid
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: vuálgáččáin
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: vuálgáččijm
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: vuálgáččijd
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: vuálgáččii

    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: vyelgeem
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: vyelgeeh
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: vuolgiš
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Du1: vuolgižeen
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Du2: vuolgišvettee
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Du3: vuolgižává
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: vuolgižep
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: vuolgišvetteđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: vuolgižeh
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vyelgi
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: vuálgus
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: vuálgoon
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: vyelgee
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: vuálgus
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vuálgup
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vyelgiđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vuálgus
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vyelgi
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuálgám

    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: vuálgáá
    vyelgiđ+V+PrsPrc: vyelgee
    vyelgiđ+V+PrfPrc: vuálgám
    vyelgiđ+V+Actio: vyelgim
    vyelgiđ+V+Actio+Ess: vyelgimin
    vyelgiđ+V+Actio+Loc: vyelgimist
    vyelgiđ+V+Actio+Ill: vyelgimân
    


  Verb - peehiđ: # MLO, checked iä
    peehiđ+V+Inf: peehiđ
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piävám
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: piäváh
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piähá
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pehheen
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pehivettee
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: peehiv
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: peehip
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pehivetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: peehih
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: peehim
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: peehih
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: peevij
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: pevvijm
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: pevvijd
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: pevvijn
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: peevijm
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: peevijd
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pehhii
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: piäváččim
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: piäváččih
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: piäváččij
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: piäváččáim
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: piäváččáid
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: piäváččáin
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: piäváččijm
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: piäváččijd
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: piäváččii
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: pevveem
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: pevveeh
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: peeviš
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Du1: pevižeen
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Du2: peevišvettee
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Du3: pevižává
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: pevižep
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: peevišvetteđ
    peehiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: pevižeh
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: peevi
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: piävus
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: piähhoon
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: pehhee
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: piähus
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: piähhup
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: peehiđ
    peehiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: piähus
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: peevi
    peehiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: piähám
    peehiđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: piäváččii
    peehiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: piävváá
    peehiđ+V+PrsPrc: pehhee
    peehiđ+V+PrfPrc: piähám
    peehiđ+V+Actio: peehim
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Ess: pehimin
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Loc: pehimist
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Ill: pehimân
    peehiđ+V+Actio+Com: pevidijn
    peehiđ+V+VAbess: pevihánnáá
    

  Verb - keessiđ: #generated from FST; MLO checked
    keessiđ+V+Inf: keessiđ
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsám
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiäsá #ok
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: keesih #keesih
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: keessim
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: keesij #corpus
    keessiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: keesi # ok
    keessiđ+V+PrfPrc: kiässám #mij keesijm


  Verb - seevviđ: #generated from FST; MLO checked
    seevviđ+V+Inf: seevviđ
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siävám #ok
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siävá #ok
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: seevih
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: seevvim
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: seevij
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: seevi #ok
    seevviđ+V+PrfPrc: siävvám

  Verb - pyehtiđ: #generated from FST; MLO checked
    pyehtiđ+V+Inf: pyehtiđ
    pyehtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puávtám
    pyehtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáhtá # corp puáhtá?
    pyehtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pyehtih
    pyehtiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: puohtim
    pyehtiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: puovtij
    pyehtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pyevti
    pyehtiđ+V+PrfPrc: puáhtám

  Verb - lyettiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    lyettiđ+V+Inf: lyettiđ
    lyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luátám
    lyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luáttá
    lyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lyettih
    lyettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luottim
    lyettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luotij
    lyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: lyeti
    lyettiđ+V+PrfPrc: luáttám
     
  Verb - vyeittiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    vyeittiđ+V+Inf: vyeittiđ
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáitám
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáittá
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vyeittih
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuoittim
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuoitij
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vyeiti
    vyeittiđ+V+PrfPrc: vuáittám
     
  Verb - kieldiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    kieldiđ+V+Inf: kieldiđ
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäldám
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiäldá
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kieldih
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kieldim
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kieldij
    kieldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kieldi
    kieldiđ+V+PrfPrc: kiäldám
     
  Verb - puáldiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    puáldiđ+V+Inf: puáldiđ
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puáldám
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáldá
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: puáldih
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: poldim
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pooldij
    puáldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puáldi
    puáldiđ+V+PrfPrc: puáldám
     
  Verb - čuággiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    čuággiđ+V+Inf: čuággiđ
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuágám
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuággá
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čuággih
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čoggim
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čoogij
    čuággiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čuági
    čuággiđ+V+PrfPrc: čuággám
     
  Verb - uástiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    uástiđ+V+Inf: uástiđ
    uástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uástám
    uástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uástá
    uástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uástih
    uástiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ostim
    uástiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oostij
    uástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uásti
    uástiđ+V+PrfPrc: uástám
     
  Verb - kevttiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    kevttiđ+V+Inf: kevttiđ
    kevttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiävtám
    kevttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiävttá # not in corpus
    kevttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kevttih
    kevttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kevttim
    kevttiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: keevtij #corp 
    kevttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: keevti
    kevttiđ+V+PrfPrc: kiävttám
     
  Verb - mäksiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    mäksiđ+V+Inf: mäksiđ
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: máávsám
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: máksá
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mäksih
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: maksim
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: maavsij
    mäksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: määvsi
    mäksiđ+V+PrfPrc: máksám
     
  Verb - väzziđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    väzziđ+V+Inf: väzziđ
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: váázám
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vázzá
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: väzzih
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vazzim
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vaazij
    väzziđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vääzi
    väzziđ+V+PrfPrc: vázzám
     
  Verb - ráhtiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    rähtiđ+V+Inf: rähtiđ
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rááhtám
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ráhtá
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rähtih
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rahtim
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: raahtij
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: räähti
    rähtiđ+V+PrfPrc: ráhtám
